src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-paarr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - paarr â-stem: # Noun 'pari' - full paradigm
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom: paarr
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill: paʹrre
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
     paarr+N+Sg+Com: paarin
     paarr+N+Ess: paarrân
     paarr+N+Par: paarrâd
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe: [paartaa, paartää]
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom: paar
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen: paari
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc: paarin
     paarr+N+Pl+Com: paarivuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe: [paaritaa, paaritää]
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: paarâž
